District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
35 act may be cited as the "Health Occupations and Emergency Medical Services Amendment Act
36 of 2026".
37 TITLE I. HEALTH OCCUPATIONS REVISION ACT AMENDMENTS
38 Sec. 101. The District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective
39 March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code§ 3-1201.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
40 (a) The table of contents is amended by adding new title headings to read as follows:
1

41 “TITLE VI-G
42 DENTISTRY; DENTAL OFFICES; ORAL AND MAXILLOFACIAL SURGERY
43 Sec. 681. Ownership, management and operation of dental offices.
44 Sec. 682. Immunization authority.
45 Sec. 683. Limitation on the use of neurotoxins.
46 Sec. 684. Oral and maxillofacial surgery specialty license.
47 TITLE VI-H
48 EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES
49 Sec. 691 Clinical oversight of EMS clinicians.
50 Sec. 692. Provision of non-EMS services.”.
51 (b) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01) is amended as follows:
52 (1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phase “Nutrition,” and inserting the
53 phrase “Nutrition, the Board of Emergency Medical Services,” in its place.
54 (2) Paragraph (1B-i) is renumbered as paragraph (1B-ii).
55 (3) A new paragraph (1B-i) is added to read as follows:
56 “(1B-i) “Certified community health worker” means a person certified under this
57 act to practice community health work.”.
58 (4) New paragraphs (6C-ii), (6C-iii), and (6C-iv) are added to read as follows:
59 “(6C-ii) “Emergency medical dispatcher” means a person who interacts with
60 callers to a public safety answering point, as defined in section 602 of the Emergency and Non-
61 Emergency Number Telephone Calling Systems Fund Act of 2000, effective October 19, 2000,
62 (D.C. Law 13-172; D.C. Official Code § 34-1801(7)), to gather necessary information to
2

63 remotely provide medical assessments, assign emergency medical resources, or provide remote
64 real-time instruction of medical and lifesaving interventions.
65 “(6C-iii)(A) “Emergency medical services clinician” means a person providing:
66 “(i) Medical assistance, medical treatment, first aid, or lifesaving
67 intervention on the scene of an emergency or in transit from the scene of an emergency to a
68 healthcare facility or other location where medical care is to be provided; or
69 “(ii) Emergency medical dispatch services.
70 (B) The term “emergency medical services clinician” includes a person
71 licensed as an emergency medical dispatcher, emergency medical responder, emergency medical
72 technician, advanced emergency medical technician, paramedic, advanced practice paramedic,
73 mobile integrated health clinician, or other licensed health professional authorized to provide
74 emergency medical services.
75 “(6C-iv) “Emergency medical services instructor” means a person engaged in the
76 business or service of teaching one or more courses of study or training designed to prepare an
77 individual for the oral, written, or practical examinations required for certification or re-
78 certification as an emergency medical services clinician.
79 (b) Section 102 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.02) is amended as follows:
80 (1) Paragraph (3A) is renumbered as (3B)
81 (2) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
82 “(3A) “Practice of certified community health work” means serving as an
83 intermediary between health and social services providers and members of the public to facilitate
84 access to health and social services, improve the quality of health and social service delivery, and
3

85 build individual and community knowledge of health conditions, available resources, and self-
86 management capacity through education, social support, and advocacy.”.
87 (3) Paragraph (5) is amended as follows:
88 (A) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “tooth or teeth”
89 and inserting the phrase “tooth or teeth, or the placement or removal of dental implants” in its
90 place.
91 (B) Subparagraph (E) is amended by striking the phrase “properly trained
92 in the administration of the anesthetic agent” and inserting the phrase “properly trained in the
93 administration of the anesthetic agent and certified by the Board of Dentistry, if required
94 pursuant to section 201(g)” in its place.
95 (C) Subparagraph (H) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting
96 the phrase “; or” in its place.
97 (D) Subparagraph (I) is amended by striking the phrase “: or” and
98 inserting a period in its place.
99 (E) Subparagraph (J) is repealed.
100 (4) A new paragraph (5A) is added to read as follows:
101 “(5A)(A) “Practice of emergency medical services” means the provision of acute
102 medical assessment, treatment, and transport of individuals experiencing illness or injury.
103 “(B) The practice of emergency medical services includes the delivery of
104 out-of-hospital emergency medical care, such as that provided at the scene of an emergency,
105 during transport, or in nontraditional settings; and
106 (5) Paragraph (10A) is redesignated as paragraph (10B).
107 (6) A new paragraph (10A) is added to read as follows:
4

108 “(10A) “Practice of oral and maxillofacial surgery” means engaging in the
109 specialty practice of dentistry that includes the diagnosis and surgical and adjunctive treatment of
110 diseases, injuries, and defects involving both the functional and aesthetic aspects of the hard and
111 soft tissues of the oral and maxillofacial region.
112 (c) Section 201(g) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1202.01(g)) is amended by striking the phrase
113 “Board of Dentistry” and inserting the word “Mayor” in its place.
114 (d) Section 203(a)(7)(b) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1202.03(a)(7)(B)) is amended by
115 striking the phrase “be limited solely to” and inserting the word “include” in its place.
116 (e) Section 203(h) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1202.03(h)) is repealed.
117 (f) Section 204(b)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1202.04(b)(2)) is amended by striking the
118 phrase “the Board shall require” and inserting the phrase “the Mayor shall require”.” in its place.
119 (g) Section 208 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1202.08) is amended as follows:
120 (1) Subsection(g-1)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “The Board and the
121 Board of Medicine shall jointly” and inserting the phrase “The Mayor shall” in its place.
122 (2) Subsection (g-1)(9) is repealed.
123 (3) Subsection (h)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “The Board and the Board
124 of Medicine shall jointly” and inserting the phrase “The Mayor shall” in its place.
125 (h) A new section 225 is added to read as follows:
126 “Sec. 225. Board of Emergency Medical Services.
127 “(a) There is established a Board of Emergency Medical Services (“Board”) to regulate
128 emergency medical services clinicians and emergency medical services instructors within the
129 District.
5

130 “(b) The Board shall have regulatory authority over emergency medical services (EMS)
131 clinicians and instructors.
132 “(c) The Board may recommend and the Mayor may establish additional levels of EMS
133 licensure and classifications as necessary to reflect evolving standards and practices in the field
134 of EMS, mobile integrated health, and its associated education.
135 “(d) The Board shall consist of 9 voting members appointed by the Mayor as follows:
136 “(1) Two physicians currently licensed and practicing in the District with
137 specialty board certification in emergency medicine, pediatric emergency medicine, or
138 emergency medical services;
139 “(2) Two emergency medical technicians, one of whom may be an advanced
140 emergency medical technician, currently licensed and practicing in the District;
141 “(3) Two paramedics currently licensed and practicing in the District;
142 “(4) One emergency medical service instructor currently licensed and practicing
143 in the District with experience in emergency medical service training, curriculum development,
144 and clinical instruction;
145 “(5) One emergency medical dispatcher currently licensed and practicing in the
146 District; and
147 “(6) One consumer representative.
148 “(e) The Mayor shall appoint an Executive Director of the Board, who shall be an
149 employee of the District and whose duties shall include providing administrative support to the
150 Board and implementing and administering the orders of the Board in accordance with this act
151 and the rules issued pursuant to this act.”.
152 (i) Section 302(3) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1203.02(3)) is amended to read as follows:
6

153 “(3) Providing investigative and inspection services, including the issuance of
154 subpoenas;”.
155 (j) Section 402 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1204.02) is amended by adding a new subsection
156 (e) to read as follows:
157 “(e)(1) If the number of vacancies on a board is more than 50% of the total number of
158 seats on the board, the Mayor may appoint temporary professional members to reduce the
159 number of vacancies to less than 50%. The appointment of a temporary professional member
160 shall not be considered the filling of a vacancy under subsection (c) of this section.
161 “(2) The temporary professional members so appointed shall:
162 “(A) Meet all qualifications required of professional members pursuant to
163 section 401;
164 “(B) Be appointed for no more than 120 days or until replaced by a full
165 member who has taken the oath of office, whichever event occurs first; and
166 “(C) Be appointed no more than once in any 2-year period to a specific
167 board as a temporary professional member.
168 (k) Section 408 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1204.08) is amended as follows:
169 (1) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
170 “(3) Make recommendations to the Mayor for standards, procedures, and rules
171 related to the regulation and licensure processes for the professionals for which they have
172 authority;”.
173 (2) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
174 semicolon in its place.
7

175 (3) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon in
176 its place.
177 (4) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon in
178 its place.
179 (5) New paragraphs (10) and (11) are added to read as follows:
180 “(10) Have the authority to convene a subcommittee consisting of less than a
181 quorum of members of the board to provide advice and assistance to the board on a specified
182 issue or to issue discipline of a person under the purview of the board; and
183 “(11) Have the authority to convene a taskforce made up of members of the board
184 and non-board members, to provide guidance and subject matter expertise on specific topics. The
185 number of taskforce members shall be less than a quorum of the board. Non-board members
186 shall be exempt from the requirements of sections 401(a) and (b), 402, and 403.”.
187 (l) Section 409 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1204.09) is amended as follows:
188 (1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Except as provided in
189 subsection (b) of this section, the” and inserting the word “The” in its place.
190 (2) Subsection (b) is repealed.
191 (m) Section 501 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.01) is amended as follows:
192 (1) Subsection (a)(1) is amended by:
193 (A) Striking the phrase “nutrition,” and inserting the phrase “nutrition, oral
194 and maxillofacial surgery” in its place; and
195 (B) Striking the phrase “athletic trainer,” and inserting the phrase “athletic
196 trainer, emergency medical services clinician, emergency medical services instructor,” in its
197 place.
8

198 (2) Subsection (a)(3) is amended by striking the phrase “doula,” and inserting the
199 phrase “certified community health worker, doula,” in its place.
200 (3) Subsection (a)(7) is amended by striking the phrase “Board of Nursing” and
201 inserting the word “Mayor” in its place.
202 (n) Section 502(a)(3) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.02(a)(3)) is amended as follows:
203 (1) (1) The lead-in text is amended by striking the phrase “state,” and
204 inserting the phrase “state or foreign jurisdiction,” in its place
205 (2) Subparagraph (A) is amended by:
206 (A) Striking the word “state” and inserting the phrase “state or foreign
207 jurisdiction” in its place; and
208 (B) Striking the phrase “30 days” and inserting the phrase “60 days in a
209 calendar year” in its place.
210 (3) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “treat, or” and inserting
211 the word “or” in its place.
212 (4) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “act;”
213 and inserting the phrase “act and has received approval from the Mayor;” in its place.
214 (5) A new subparagraph (D) is added to read as follows:
215 “(D) “The individual is called in to provide professional
216 consultation by and in affiliation with a comparable licensed healthcare professional on behalf of
217 a client or patient to treat the specific client or patient in the District, after notification has been
218 provided to the Mayor.”.
219 (o) Section 503(a)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.03(a)(2)) is amended to read as
220 follows:
9

221 “(2)(A) Is at least 18 years of age; or
222 “(B) If the individual is applying for certification or licensure as a certified
223 community health worker, emergency medical responder, emergency medical technician, nursing
224 assistive personnel, or pharmacy technician trainees, is at least 16 years of age and has or is
225 enrolled in and actively pursuing a high school diploma or high school equivalence diploma as
226 that term is defined in section 561(6) of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982,
227 effective October 27, 1995 (D.C. Law 11-72; § 4-205.61(6)); provided, that the Mayor may
228 restrict the certification or license of an individual under the age of 18; and
229 “(C) For the purposes of this act, a minor of the age of 16 years or more may,
230 notwithstanding such minority and to the same extent as exercised by a person of full legal age:
231 “(i) Enter into and be bound by an agreement to protect the confidentiality
232 of a patient’s health information; and
233 “(ii) Enter into and be bound by a non-disciplinary settlement agreement
234 in lieu of disciplinary action by the certifying body or licensing board for the minor’s
235 profession;”.
236 (p) Section 504(m) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.04(m)) is amended by replacing the
237 words “approved by the Board” with “approved by the Mayor.”
238 (q) Section 504(n) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.04(n)) is amended by replacing the
239 words “approved by the Board” with “approved by the Mayor”.
240 (r) A new title VI-G is added to read as follows:
241 “TITLE VI-G. DENTISTRY; DENTAL OFFICES; ORAL AND MAXILLOFACIAL
242 SURGERY
243 “Sec. 681. Ownership, management and operation of dental offices.
10

244 “No person other than a dentist licensed by the District shall be a manager, owner,
245 operator, or conductor of a business or place where dental or dental-hygiene services are
246 performed or own and control the equipment used to perform such services; employ or contract
247 with dentists or dental hygienists to provide dental or dental hygiene services; or exercise control
248 over patient records; provided, that the foregoing restrictions shall not apply to:
249 “(a) Federal or District government agencies providing dental services within affiliated
250 facilities or engaged in providing public health measures to prevent disease;
251 “(b) Schools of dentistry, dental hygiene, or dental assisting accredited by the
252 Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association and providing dental
253 services solely in an educational setting;
254 “(c) Federally Qualified Health Centers, as designated by the United States Department
255 of Health and Human Services, providing dental services;
256 “(d) Nonprofit community-based entities or organizations that use a majority of public
257 funds to provide dental and dental-hygiene services for indigent persons;
258 “(e) Hospitals licensed by the Department of Health;
259 “(f) Partnerships, professional corporations, or professional limited liability companies
260 solely consisting of and operated by dentists licensed under this act for the purpose of providing
261 dental services;
262 “(g) Spouses and domestic partners of deceased licensed dentists for a period of one year
263 following the death of the licensee; and
264 “(h) An administrator, executor, personal representative, guardian, conservator, or
265 receiver of the estate (“appointee”) of a deceased licensed dentist, for a period of one year
266 following the creation of the control or ownership interest of the appointee;”.
11

267 Sec. 682. Immunization authority.
268 “A dentist licensed by the District may prescribe and administer immunizations and
269 vaccinations when certified by the Board of Dentistry to do so.
270 Sec. 683. Limitation on the use of neurotoxins.
271 “A dentist licensed by the District shall not use botulinum toxin or another neurotoxin to
272 treat a dental condition, unless:
273 “(a) The neurotoxin is approved for use by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration;
274 “(b) Use of the neurotoxin for treatment of the dental condition has been authorized by
275 the Mayor through rulemaking; and
276 “(c) The dentist has been certified by the Board of Dentistry to use the neurotoxin.”.
277 “Sec. 684. Oral and maxillofacial surgery specialty license.
278 “(a) A dentist shall not engage in the practice of oral and maxillofacial surgery unless the
279 dentist holds a valid oral and maxillofacial surgery specialty license issued by the Board of
280 Dentistry.
281 “(b) To be eligible for an oral and maxillofacial surgery specialty license, a dentist shall:
282 “(1) Have a valid dental license in good standing in the District of Columbia; and
283 “(2) Have successfully completed an oral and maxillofacial surgery residency
284 program approved by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental
285 Association or by another entity that is recognized by the Board as authorized to approve oral
286 and maxillofacial surgery residency programs.
287 “(c) A licensed oral and maxillofacial surgeon shall not perform any of the following
288 procedures unless the licensed oral and maxillofacial surgeon holds a valid certification to
289 perform the specified procedure issued by the Board of Dentistry:
12

290 “(1) Rhinoplasty and other treatment of the nose;
291 “(2) Blepharoplasty and other treatment of the eyelid;
292 “(3) Rhytidectomy and other treatment of facial skin wrinkles and sagging;
293 “(4) Submental liposuction and other procedures to remove fat;
294 “(5) Laser resurfacing or dermabrasion and other procedures to remove facial skin
295 irregularities;
296 “(6) Browlift (either open or endoscopic technique) and other procedures to
297 remove furrows and sagging skin on the upper eyelid or forehead;
298 “(7) Platysma muscle plication and other procedures to correct the angle between
299 the chin and neck;
300 “(8) Otoplasty and other procedures to change the appearance of the ear;
301 “(9) Application of injectable medication or material for the purpose of treating
302 extraoral cosmetic conditions, but shall not include botulinum toxin; and
303 “(10) Any other oral or maxillofacial procedure for which certification by the
304 Mayor is required through rulemaking.”.
305 “(d) A certification issued by the Board of Dentistry pursuant to subsection (c) of this
306 section shall authorize the oral and maxillofacial surgeon to perform the authorized procedures
307 only above the clavicle.
308 “(e) The Mayor shall promulgate rules establishing the education, training, and
309 experience criteria for certification of oral and maxillofacial surgeons to perform certain
310 aesthetic or cosmetic procedures within the definition of oral and maxillofacial surgery.
311 “(f) The Mayor may issue rules establishing additional aesthetic or cosmetic procedures
312 for which certification shall be required.”.
13

313 (s) A new title VI-H is added to read as follows:
314 “TITLE VI-H. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES
315 “Sec. 691. Clinical oversight of EMS clinicians.
316 “No person, including a person licensed as an EMS clinician by the District, shall
317 perform services as an EMS clinician in the District without clinical oversight of an EMS agency
318 medical director or the medical director of the healthcare facility in which the clinician is
319 practicing.”.
320 “Sec. 692. Provision of non-EMS services.
321 “An EMS clinician, in addition to engaging in the practice of emergency medical
322 services, may provide emergency and non-emergency medical care within a healthcare facility or
323 other facility that renders healthcare services if authorized to do so by the medical director of that
324 facility.”
325 (t) Section 509a(g)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.09a(g)(1)) is amended by striking the
326 phrase “as the Board” and inserting the phrase “as the Mayor” in its place.
327 (u) Section 511a (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.11a) is amended as follows:
328 (1) Subsection (c) is repealed.
329 (2) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “514.” and inserting the
330 phrase “514, or failure to meet the requirements of subsections (a) or (b) of this section.” in its
331 place.
332 (v) Section 514(a) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.14(a)) is amended as follows:
333 (1) Paragraph (54) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a
334 semicolon in its place.
14

335 (2) Paragraph (55) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
336 or” in its place.
337 (3) A new paragraph (56) is added to read as follows:
338 “(56) Violates section 681 of the Health Occupations and Emergency Medical
339 Services Amendment Act of 2026, if the person is a dentist.”
340 (w) Section 514(c)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.14(c)(2)) is amended by striking the
341 phrase “or withdraw approval of a school of nursing or nursing program.”
342 (x) Section 514b (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.14b is amended by striking the phrase
343 “Board of Nursing” and inserting the word “Mayor” in its place.
344 (y) Section 519(a-2) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.19(a-2) is amended to read as follows:
345 “(a-2) Before the Mayor takes an action pursuant to section 514b, the Mayor shall give
346 the program or operator of the program an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with this
347 section.
348 (z) Section 519(b) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.19(b) is amended by striking the phrase
349 “person certified, or person or entity operating a nursing education or nursing assistive personnel
350 training program.” and inserting the phrase “person certified.” in its place.
351 (aa) Section 522 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.22) is amended to read as follows:
352 “(b) The criminal background check shall be conducted by the U.S. Department of
353 Justice or an agency or other entity determined by the Mayor. The results of the criminal
354 background check shall be forwarded directly from the entity conducting the background check
355 to the Mayor or the appropriate health licensing board.”.
356 (bb) Section 524 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.24) is repealed.
15

357 (cc) Section 631(e)(2)(B)(iii) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1206.31(e)(2)(B)(iii)) is amended
358 by striking the phrase “Board of Medicine” and inserting the word “Mayor” in its place.
359 (dd) Section 704 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1207.54) is amended as follows:
360 (1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “The Board” and inserting
361 the phrase “The Mayor” in its place.
362 (2) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “The Board, through
363 rulemaking” and inserting the phrase “The Mayor, through rulemaking” in its place.
364 (ee) Section 803(a) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1208.03(a)) is amended to read as follows:
365 “(a) The Board of Social Work shall license as an independent social worker a person
366 who, in addition to meeting the requirements of Title V (with the exception of the examination
367 requirement under Section 506) has a master’s degree or a doctorate from a social work program
368 accredited by the Council on Social Work Education, and has at least 3,000 hours of post-
369 master’s or postdoctoral experience under the supervision of a licensed independent social
370 worker over a period of not less than 2 or more than 4 years.
371 (ff) A new section 807 is added to read as follows:
372 “Sec. 807. Community health worker.
373 “(a) The Board of Social Work shall certify a person as a certified community health
374 worker who, in addition to meeting the requirements of this act, meets any requirements the
375 Mayor may establish by rule.”.
376 (gg) Section 841 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1208.41) is amended as follows:
377 (1) Subsection (a)(1) is amended by striking the word “Board” and inserting the
378 word “Mayor” in its place.
16

379 (2) Subsection (a)(3) is amended by striking the word “Board” and inserting the
380 word “Mayor” in its place.
381 (3) Subsection (b)(1) is amended by striking the word “Board” and inserting the
382 word “Mayor” in its place.
383 (4) Subsection (b)(3) is amended by striking the word “Board” and inserting the
384 word “Mayor” in its place.
385 (hh) Section 851(a)(1)(A) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1208.51(a)(1)(A)) is amended by
386 striking the word “Board” and inserting the word “Mayor” in its place.
387 (ii) Section 852(a)(1)(A) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1208.52(a)(1)(A)) is amended by
388 striking the word “Board” and inserting the word “Mayor” in its place.
389 (jj) Section 909(e)(3) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1209.09(e)(3)) is amended by striking the
390 word “Board” and inserting the word “Mayor” in its place.
391 (kk) Section 911(c)(5) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1209.11(c)(5)) is amended by striking the
392 word “Board” and inserting the word “Mayor” in its place.
393 (ll) Section 1003 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1210.03) is amended by adding a new
394 subsection (pp) to read as follows:
395 “(pp) Unless certified as a community health worker by the Mayor under this act, a
396 person shall not represent themselves as a “certified community health worker” or by a similar
397 title; provided, that this subsection shall not restrict the person from using the generic term
398 “community health worker.”
399 (mm) Section 1011(b)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1210.11(b)(1)) is amended by striking
400 the word “board” and inserting the word “Mayor” in its place.
401 TITLE II. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES
17

402 Sec. 201. Short title.
403 This title may be cited as the “Emergency Medical Services Act of 2026”.
404 Sec. 202. Definitions.
405 For the purposes of this act, the term:
406 (1) “Ambulance” means any privately or publicly owned vehicle specially
407 designed, constructed, modified, or equipped for use as a means for transporting patients in a
408 medical emergency or any privately or publicly owned vehicle that is advertised, marked, or in
409 any way held out as a vehicle for the transportation of patients requiring emergency medical
410 services. The term “ambulance” includes vehicles capable of operating on land, on water, and in
411 air.
412 (2) “Competency evaluation” means any written, oral, or practical examination or
413 assessment of the knowledge or skills of an applicant for certification or re-certification as
414 emergency medical services personnel that is pertinent to the ability of that applicant to perform
415 their duties. Each competency evaluation may include one or more sub-parts, including
416 individual demonstrations and assessments of the applicant's performance in actual or simulated
417 emergency situations.
418 (3) “Emergency” means the existence of circumstances in which the element of
419 time in treating, or in transporting to medical treatment, a person who is ill, injured, wounded, or
420 otherwise incapacitated is essential to the health or life of that person, and in which rescue
421 operations, or competent first aid, or both may be essential to the health or life of that person.
422 (4)(A) “Emergency medical response vehicle” means a vehicle or conveyance of
423 which the primary intended use is to respond to the scene of a medical emergency for the
18

424 purpose of rendering medical assistance, including the provision of medical assistance on the
425 scene or the transportation of patients to a healthcare facility or other treatment facility.
426 (B) The term “emergency medical response vehicle” includes:
427 (i) Ambulances that operate as motor vehicles, watercraft, or
428 aircraft; and
429 (ii) Fire engines, motor vehicles, utility vehicles, bicycles, and
430 other motorized or non-motorized ground, water, or air vehicles used to transport emergency
431 medical services personnel, supplies, or equipment to the scene of an emergency.
432 (C) The term “emergency medical response vehicle” does not include any
433 vehicle that responds to the scene of a medical emergency that is not intended to render medical
434 assistance, such as a law enforcement vehicle.
435 (5) “Emergency medical services agency” means an entity engaged in the
436 business or service of one or more of the following:
437 (A) Responding to requests for emergency medical assistance;
438 (B) Transporting patients from the scene of an emergency to a healthcare
439 facility or other treatment facility;
440 (C) Providing medical assistance to patients on the scene of an emergency
441 or in transit from the scene of an emergency to a healthcare facility or other treatment facility;
442 (D) Providing medical assistance to patients at special events;
443 (E) Providing medical care through mobile integrated healthcare services;
444 or
445 (F) Providing non-emergency patient transport.
19

446 (6) “Emergency medical services training facility” means an institution or entity
447 engaged in the business or service of providing one or more courses of study or training designed
448 to prepare interested persons for the oral, written, or practical examinations required for licensure
449 or renewal as emergency medical services clinicians.
450 (7) “Healthcare facility” means a hospital, maternity center, ambulatory surgical
451 facility, or hospice, as defined in section 2 of the Health-Care and Community Residence
452 Facility, Hospice and Home Care Licensure Act of 1983, effective February 24, 1984 (D.C. Law
453 5-48; D.C. Official Code § 44-501) or any other facility designated by the Director of the
454 Department of Health for the purpose of rendering medical, clinical, or supportive care.
455 (8) “Medical control system” means a system wherein direct clinical instructions
456 are given to emergency medical services clinicians in the field by authorized healthcare
457 professionals with independent practice authority.
458 (9) “Medical director” means a physician licensed to practice medicine in the
459 District who has responsibility for the medical oversight of the clinical operations of an
460 emergency medical services agency.
461 (10) “Mobile integrated health services” means services provided by an
462 emergency medical services agency through the use of licensed clinicians to patients who do not
463 require emergency medical transportation. Mobile integrated healthcare services may include:
464 (A) Preventive and primary care services;
465 (B) Chronic disease monitoring and management;
466 (C) Post-discharge follow-up;
467 (D) Behavioral health support and crisis intervention;
468 (E) Social determinants of health screenings and referrals;
20

469 (F) Non-emergent care coordination and patient navigation services; and
470 (G) Health education and public health outreach.
471 (11) “Mutual aid” means an agreement whereby the District of Columbia requests
472 the assistance of an outside entity to provide supplemental or specialized emergency medical
473 services in an emergent situation, pursuant to established protocols.
474 (12) “Non-emergency” means a situation in which a patient or person requires
475 medical monitoring that does not meet the time-sensitive nature of an emergency.
476 (13) “Patient” means an individual for whom an emergency medical services
477 agency or clinician is activated or engaged to provide emergency medical services when the
478 individual’s condition requires medical observation, monitoring, assessment, or treatment for an
479 acute or chronic illness, disease, injury, or other disability.
480 (14) “Qualified healthcare professional” means a person licensed and qualified in
481 accordance with the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective
482 March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01 et seq.), and with rules
483 promulgated pursuant to that act, to engage in the act of prescribing and of rendering medical
484 care and advice under the circumstances presented.
485 (14) “Special event emergency medical services” means the organized and
486 coordinated provision of emergency medical care, medical response, and support of public health
487 at planned events, gatherings, or activities where attendance, participation, venue characteristics,
488 or general event operations create increased risk or potential for illness or injury.
489 (15) “Specialty systems of care” means coordinated, Districtwide clinical care
490 frameworks organized around specific time sensitive or resource intensive medical conditions, in
491 which designated hospitals and supporting partners meet defined standards for capability,
21

492 capacity, expertise, and data reporting as defined by the Mayor. Specialty systems of care
493 include trauma, stroke, cardiac, burn, and pediatric care systems.
494 (16) “Stretcher van agency” means an entity engaged in the business or service of
495 transporting patients who require the use of a stretcher and do not require medical monitoring or
496 treatment during transport.
497 (17) “Stretcher van vehicle” means a vehicle or conveyance used to transport non-
498 emergency passengers who require the use of a stretcher and does not provide medical
499 monitoring or treatment during transport.
500 (18) “Treatment facility” means an urgent care center, treatment center, clinic, or
501 other facility or office at which medical or psychological services are performed, and which has
502 been designated by the Mayor as a facility authorized to receive patients transported by
503 emergency medical services agencies or clinicians.
504 Sec. 203. Applicability and exemptions.
505 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this act, this act shall apply to every:
506 (1) Entity providing emergency medical services within the District, whether
507 public or private or for-profit or not-for-profit, including owners and operators of emergency
508 medical services agencies and owners and operators of emergency medical response vehicles;
509 (2) Entity or individual providing non-emergency transport services within the
510 District, whether public or private or for-profit or not-for-profit, including owners and operators
511 of stretcher van agencies and owners and operators of stretcher van vehicles; and
512 (3) Entity or individual providing emergency medical services training and
513 instruction, whether public or private or for-profit or not-for-profit, within the District, including
514 owners and operators.
22

515 (b) The provisions of this act shall not apply to the following:
516 (1) The unexpected rendering of immediate care by a private citizen, or the
517 unexpected use of a privately owned vehicle which is not ordinarily used in the business of
518 transporting persons who are sick, injured, wounded, or otherwise incapacitated or helpless, in
519 the performance of a lifesaving act;
520 (2) Agencies, vehicles, or training facilities owned or operated by the United
521 States government and operating on federal property;
522 (3) Agencies operating within the District of Columbia pursuant to mutual aid
523 agreements;
524 (4) Validly licensed or certified emergency medical services agencies or response
525 vehicles engaged in a response that originates from outside of the District;
526 (5) Validly licensed or certified emergency medical services agencies or response
527 vehicles that have obtained a limited authorization from the Mayor, or the Mayor’s designee, in
528 advance of the movement of a patient.
529 (6) Validly licensed or certified stretcher van vehicles that initiate transport
530 outside of the District and do not otherwise constitute public vehicles for hire; and
531 (7) Validly licensed vehicles operated solely for the transportation of a person to
532 and from treatment facilities as outpatients; provided that this exemption shall not apply to a
533 vehicle which is in any way held out as an emergency medical response vehicle or a stretcher
534 van vehicle, or to a vehicle in which the person being transported meets the definition of a
535 patient.
536 Sec. 204. Emergency medical services agencies and training facilities: general
537 requirements.
23

538 (a) Each emergency medical services agency and training facility, other than a stretcher
539 van agency, operating in the District shall have a medical director. The medical director shall
540 provide clinical oversight of operations, including the development and implementation of
541 clinical protocols, quality assurance measures, and integration with the District’s medical control
542 system.
543 (b) Emergency medical services agencies and training facilities and stretcher van
544 agencies shall submit data as required by the Mayor for the purpose of evaluating outcomes,
545 cost-effectiveness, program utilization, and quality improvement.
546 Sec. 205. Emergency medical services agencies: license required.
547 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this act, no person or entity shall operate an
548 emergency medical services agency, whether public or private or for-profit or not-for-profit, in
549 the District without an emergency medical services agency license issued by the Mayor.
550 (b) An applicant for a license to operate an emergency medical services agency shall
551 establish to the satisfaction of the Mayor that the agency meets all requirements set forth in this
552 act and in rules promulgated pursuant to this act.
553 (c) An applicant for a license shall:
554 (1) Submit an application to the Mayor on a form approved by the Mayor;
555 (2) Submit supporting documentation as required by the Mayor, including all
556 certificates of approval, authority, occupancy, or need that are required as a precondition to
557 lawful operation in the District of Columbia; and
558 (3) Pay the applicable fee established by the Mayor through rulemaking, except
559 that no license fee shall be required of an emergency medical services agency operated by the
560 District government.
24

561 (d) A license to operate an emergency medical services agency shall be valid only for the
562 persons and premises named as applicants in the application. Any change in the ownership of an
563 emergency medical services agency owned by an individual, partnership, or association, or in the
564 legal or beneficial ownership of 25% or more of the stock of a corporation that owns or operates
565 an emergency medical services agency shall require a new application for licensure.
566 Sec. 206. Stretcher van agencies: license required.
567 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this act, no person or entity shall operate a stretcher
568 van agency in the District, whether public or private or for-profit or not-for-profit, without a
569 stretcher van agency license issued by the Mayor.
570 (b) An applicant for a license to operate a stretcher van agency shall establish to the
571 satisfaction of the Mayor that the agency meets all requirements set forth in this act and in rules
572 issued pursuant to this act.
573 (c) An applicant for a license shall:
574 (1) Submit an application to the Mayor on a form approved by the Mayor;
575 (2) Submit supporting documentation as required by the Mayor, including all
576 certificates of approval, authority, occupancy, or need that are required as a precondition to
577 lawful operation in the District; and
578 (3) Pay the applicable fee established by the Mayor through rulemaking, except
579 that no license fee shall be required of a stretcher van agency operated by the District
580 government.
581 (d) A license to operate a stretcher van agency shall be valid only for the persons and
582 premises named as applicants in the application. Any change in the ownership of a stretcher van
583 agency owned by an individual, partnership, or association, or in the legal or beneficial
25

584 ownership of 25% or more of the stock of a corporation that owns or operates a stretcher van
585 agency, shall require a new application for licensure.
586 (e) Stretcher van agencies shall not be held out as a substitute for emergency medical
587 services. A stretcher van agency shall refer or transfer care to an emergency medical services
588 agency, healthcare facility, or hospital when clinically indicated.
589 Sec. 207. Mobile integrated healthcare services.
590 (a)(1) No person shall provide mobile integrated healthcare services in the District
591 without a mobile integrated healthcare services license issued by the Mayor.
592 (2) To qualify for a mobile integrated healthcare services license, an applicant
593 shall:
594 (A) Hold a valid license as an emergency medical services agency in good
595 standing;
596 (B) Submit a mobile integrated healthcare program plan for approval by
597 the Mayor, detailing clinical services, clinical protocols, staffing models, data collection and
598 evaluation practices, and collaboration agreements with health and social service entities;
599 (C) Demonstrate the ability to provide services through qualified
600 personnel, including paramedics, advanced emergency medical technicians, or other licensed or
601 certified health professionals operating within their scope of practice and under the supervision
602 of a medical director;
603 (D) Pay an application fee established by the Mayor through rulemaking;
604 and
605 (E) Pay an inspection fee established by the Mayor through rulemaking.
26

606 (b) Mobile integrated healthcare services shall be provided in accordance such standards
607 as the Mayor may establish by rule.
608 (c) Mobile integrated healthcare services shall not replace emergency medical services. A
609 mobile integrated healthcare service provider shall refer or transfer care to the appropriate
610 emergency medical services agency, healthcare facility, or hospital when clinically indicated.
611 Sec. 208. Special events emergency medical services agency.
612 (a)(1) No person shall provide special event emergency medical services in the District
613 without a special event emergency medical services agency license issued by the Mayor.
614 (2) To qualify for a special event emergency medical services agency license, an
615 applicant shall:
616 (A) Hold a valid license as an emergency medical services agency in good
617 standing;
618 (B) Submit a special event emergency medical services operational plan
619 for approval by the Mayor, detailing clinical services, staffing models, data collection and
620 evaluation practices, and collaboration agreements entities;
621 (C) Demonstrate the ability to provide services through qualified
622 personnel, including emergency medical responders, emergency medical technicians,
623 paramedics, advanced emergency medical technicians, or other licensed or certified health
624 professionals operating within their scope of practice and under the supervision of a medical
625 director;
626 (D) Pay an application fee established by the Mayor by rule; and
627 (E) Pay an inspection fee established by the Mayor through rulemaking.
27

628 (c) A special event emergency medical services agency shall refer or transfer care to an
629 emergency medical services agency, healthcare facility, or hospital when clinically indicated.
630 (d) Special event emergency medical services shall coordinate their activities with the
631 District’s emergency medical services agencies and the Department of Health, in a manner
632 prescribed by the Department of Health which shall include communications and logistics
633 planning, mobilization strategy, and response planning, before providing services.
634 Sec. 209. Emergency medical services training facilities: license required.
635 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this act, no person or entity shall operate an
636 emergency medical services training facility in the District, whether public or private, for-profit
637 or not-for-profit, without first having obtained a license from the Mayor to do so.
638 (b) An applicant for a license to operate an emergency medical services training facility
639 shall establish to the satisfaction of the Mayor that the facility meets all requirements set forth in
640 this act and in rules promulgated pursuant to this act.
641 (c) An applicant for a license shall:
642 (1) Submit an application to the Mayor on a form approved by the Mayor;
643 (2) Submit supporting documentation as required by the Mayor, including all
644 certificates of approval, authority, occupancy, or need that are required as a precondition to
645 lawful operation in the District of Columbia;
646 (3) Pay the applicable fee established by the Mayor through rulemaking, except
647 that no license fee shall be required of an emergency medical services training facility operated
648 by the District government; and
649 (4) Pay the applicable inspection fee established by the Mayor through
650 rulemaking.
28

651 (d) A license to operate an emergency medical services training facility shall be issued
652 for a period of time not to exceed 2 years.
653 (e) A license to operate an emergency medical services training facility shall be valid
654 only for the persons and premises named as applicants in the application. Any change in the
655 ownership of an emergency medical services training facility owned by an individual,
656 partnership, or association, or in the legal or beneficial ownership of 25% or more of the stock of
657 a corporation that owns or operates an emergency medical services training facility, shall require
658 a new application for licensure.
659 (f) An emergency medical services training facility shall conform to curriculum and
660 competency evaluation standards as developed by the Mayor.
661 Sec. 210. Emergency medical response vehicles: license required.
662 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this act or during a declared state of emergency or
663 public health emergency under sections 5 or 5a of the District of Columbia Public Emergency
664 Act of 1980, effective March 5, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-149; D.C. Official Code §§ 7-2304, 7304.01),
665 no ground, air, water, or other emergency response conveyance intended to transport patients
666 may be operated in the District without a currently valid emergency response transport vehicle
667 license issued by the Mayor for that vehicle.
668 (b) Except as otherwise provided in this act, no ground, air, water, or other emergency
669 response conveyance intended to respond to medical emergencies but not transport patients may
670 be operated in the District without a currently valid emergency response non-transport vehicle
671 license issued by the Mayor for that vehicle.
672 (c) An applicant for a license to operate an emergency response transport or non-transport
673 vehicle shall establish to the satisfaction of the Mayor that the vehicle, including its emergency
29

674 medical response equipment and supplies, meets all applicable requirements set forth in this act
675 and in rules promulgated pursuant to this act.
676 (d) An applicant for a license shall:
677 (1) Submit an application to the Mayor on a form approved by the Mayor;
678 (2) Submit supporting documentation as required by the Mayor, including all
679 certificates of approval, authority, and motor vehicle registration required as a precondition to
680 lawful operation in the District of Columbia;
681 (3) Pay the applicable vehicle licensure fee established by the Mayor through
682 rulemaking, except that no vehicle license fee shall be required for an emergency medical
683 response vehicle operated by the District government; and
684 (4) Pay the applicable vehicle inspection fee established by the Mayor through
685 rulemaking.
686 (e) No license for an emergency medical response vehicle intended to transport patients
687 shall be issued unless the Mayor finds that the vehicle is in compliance with all applicable laws
688 and rules relating to the provision of emergency medical services.
689 (f) The Mayor shall issue rules establishing minimum staffing for emergency medical
690 response vehicles.
691 (g) A license for the operation of an emergency medical response vehicle shall be issued
692 for a period of time not to exceed one year.
693 (h) A license for the operation of an emergency medical response vehicle shall be valid
694 only for the persons and vehicle named as applicants in the application. No emergency medical
695 response vehicle license or certification shall be sold or transferred. An emergency medical
30

696 services agency purchasing a formerly licensed emergency medical response vehicle for use as
697 an emergency medical response vehicle shall apply for and obtain a license.
698 Sec. 211. Liability insurance required for vehicles, facilities, and agencies.
699 (a) No license shall be issued pursuant to this act to any emergency medical response
700 vehicle used to transport patients unless there is, at all times in force and effect, insurance
701 coverage for the vehicle, issued by an insurance company or companies licensed to do business
702 in the District, providing for the payment of damages for the following:
703 (1) Bodily injury to, or death of, individuals in accidents resulting from any cause
704 for which the owner of the vehicle would be liable, regardless of whether the vehicle was being
705 operated by the owner or by the owner’s agent; and
706 (2) Loss of, or damage to, the property of another, including personal property,
707 under similar circumstances.
708 (b) No license shall be issued pursuant to this act to an emergency medical services
709 training facility, on the premises of which training instruction or evaluation is conducted, unless
710 there is, at all times in force and effect, insurance coverage for the facility premises, issued by an
711 insurance company or companies licensed to do business in the District, providing for the
712 payment of damages for bodily injury, death, and damage to or loss of personal property, for any
713 reason for which the owner or operator of the premises would be liable.
714 (c) No license shall be issued pursuant to this act to an emergency medical services
715 agency unless there is, in addition to vehicle and premises coverage as specified herein, at all
716 times in force and effect, incidental malpractice insurance coverage specific to the duties of a
717 medical director.
31

718 (d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to emergency medical response vehicles,
719 emergency medical services training facilities, and emergency medical services agencies owned
720 and operated by agencies of the District government.
721 (e) The Mayor shall promulgate rules further specifying the insurance to be required of
722 all emergency medical response vehicles, emergency medical services training facilities, and
723 emergency medical services agencies licensed pursuant to this act.
724 (f) The cancellation or other termination of any insurance policy required pursuant to this
725 section shall nullify or invalidate any licenses issued for emergency medical response vehicles,
726 emergency medical services training facilities, and emergency medical services agencies covered
727 by the policy, unless another insurance policy complying with the provisions of this section has
728 been obtained and is in effect at the time of the cancellation or termination.
729 Sec. 212. Provisional and restricted licenses.
730 (a) The Mayor may issue a provisional license to a new emergency medical services
731 agency or emergency medical services training facility to afford the Mayor sufficient time and
732 evidence to evaluate whether the new emergency medical services agency or emergency medical
733 services training facility is capable of complying with the provisions of this act, rules
734 promulgated pursuant to this act, and other applicable provisions of law.
735 (b) As an alternative to denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of a license, when
736 an emergency medical services agency, emergency medical services training facility, or
737 emergency medical response vehicle is not in substantial compliance with the provisions of this
738 act, rules promulgated pursuant to this act, or other applicable provisions of law, and the Mayor
739 finds that the public interest would be served thereby, the Mayor may:
32

740 (1) Issue a provisional license if the owner or operator of the emergency medical
741 services agency, emergency medical services training facility, or emergency medical response
742 vehicle is taking appropriate ameliorative action in accordance with an agreed-upon timetable; or
743 (2) Issue a restricted license that prohibits the emergency medical services
744 agency, emergency medical services training facility, or emergency medical response vehicle
745 from accepting new patients or students, or from delivering certain specified services that it
746 would otherwise be authorized to deliver, or from other activities designated by the Mayor, until
747 appropriate ameliorative action is taken.
748 (c) Provisional licenses issued pursuant to this section may be granted for a period of
749 time not to exceed 180 days and may be renewed no more than once.
750 Sec. 213. Licenses and certifications issued pursuant to prior authority.
751 Except as otherwise provided in this act, any emergency medical services agency,
752 ambulance or other emergency medical response vehicle, or emergency medical services training
753 facility licensed or certified pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services Act of 2008, effective
754 March 25, 2009 (D.C. Law 17-357; D.C. Official Code § 7–2341.01 et seq.) as of the effective
755 date of the District of Columbia Health Care Act of 2026, shall be considered licensed or
756 certified pursuant to this act, and shall be subject to the renewal requirements established by this
757 act and by rules promulgated pursuant to this act.
758 Sec. 214. Powers and duties of the Mayor.
759 (a) To ensure compliance with the provisions of this act and of any rules issued pursuant
760 to this act, the Mayor may at any time conduct an inspection of an emergency medical services
761 agency, emergency medical response vehicle, or emergency medical services training facility for
762 which a license has been issued or application for licensure has been submitted. The licensee or
33

763 applicant subject to inspection shall cooperate with the Mayor and provide timely access to the
764 site or equipment.
765 (b) In the alternative or in addition to conducting an inspection or evaluation, the Mayor
766 may demand the production of all records relating to the operation of an emergency medical
767 services agency, emergency medical response vehicle, or emergency medical services training
768 facility, or to the performance of duties by any person acting as an agent of an emergency
769 medical service agency or emergency medical service training facility licensed pursuant to this
770 act or for which an application has been submitted. The licensee or applicant subject to
771 inspection or evaluation shall cooperate with the Mayor and provide timely and full access to all
772 such records.
773 (c) To ensure compliance with the provisions of this act and of any rules promulgated
774 pursuant to this act, the Mayor may conduct investigations, as needed, and may administer oaths,
775 examine witnesses, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses or
776 the production of books, records, or other documents. In case of contempt or refusal to obey a
777 subpoena, the Mayor shall refer the matter to the Office of the Attorney General who may
778 petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to issue an order requiring the person to
779 appear and testify or to produce books, papers, or other evidence bearing on the investigation.
780 (d) The Mayor shall maintain and make available to the public information concerning:
781 (1) Application, licensure, and renewal requirements and procedures; and
782 (2) An official register of licensed emergency medical services agencies and
783 emergency medical services training facilities.
784 (e) The Mayor may establish medical control systems and protocols that are applicable to
785 all emergency medical services agencies.
34

786 Sec. 215. License renewal.
787 (a) An application for renewal of a license shall be submitted to the Mayor no later than
788 90 days before expiration of the license, on a form approved by the Mayor, accompanied by the
789 appropriate renewal fee established by the Mayor through rulemaking. An application for
790 renewal for an emergency medical services agency or an emergency medical services training
791 facility submitted later than 90 days before expiration shall be subject to a late fee as established
792 by the Mayor through rulemaking.
793 (b) A license issued pursuant to this act for which timely renewal application is made
794 shall continue in force beyond the expiration date until the Mayor acts on the renewal
795 application.
796 Sec. 16. Denial, suspension, and revocation of license or designation.
797 (a) The Mayor, subject to the right to a hearing as provided in section 18, may deny
798 issuance of, deny renewal of, suspend, or revoke a license to operate an emergency medical
799 services agency, an emergency medical response vehicle, or an emergency medical services
800 training facility to a person or entity which is found to have:
801 (1) Failed to comply with the applicable provisions of this act or of rules
802 promulgated pursuant to this act;
803 (2) Failed to comply with any other federal or District law applicable to the
804 operation of an emergency medical services agency, an emergency medical response vehicle, or
805 an emergency medical services training facility; or
806 (3) Committed, aided, abetted, or permitted to be committed any act of
807 dishonesty, fraud, gross negligence, abuse, assault, or other illegal act related to the operation of
35

808 an emergency medical services agency, emergency medical response vehicle, or emergency
809 medical services training facility.
810 (b) Upon suspension, revocation, or termination of a license issued pursuant to this act,
811 the owner or operator of the license shall immediately surrender the license and immediately
812 cease operations under the license. In the case of a vehicle used to transport patients, no person
813 or entity shall permit the vehicle to be used for that purpose.
814 Sec. 217. Summary suspension.
815 (a) If, after an investigation, the Mayor determines that an emergency medical services
816 agency, emergency medical response vehicle, or emergency medical services training facility
817 licensed pursuant to this act has failed to comply with the provisions of this act or with rules
818 promulgated pursuant to this act, in such a manner as to present an imminent danger to the
819 health, safety, or welfare of any person or of the general public, the Mayor may summarily
820 suspend the license prior to a hearing.
821 (b) The Mayor shall provide, as soon as possible, the owner or operator of the emergency
822 medical services agency, emergency medical response vehicle, or emergency medical services
823 training facility, with written notice of the summary suspension. The notice shall inform the
824 affected owner, operator, or entity of the reason for the suspension and of the right to request a
825 hearing.
826 (c) The owner or operator of the emergency medical services agency, emergency medical
827 response vehicle, or emergency medical services training facility shall have 5 business days after
828 service of the notice of summary suspension in which to request a hearing to challenge the
829 summary suspension. If requested, the hearing shall be conducted by the Office of
36

830 Administrative Hearings. A hearing shall be held within 5 business days of a timely request, and
831 a decision shall be issued within 5 business days after the record is closed.
832 Sec.218. Hearings.
833 (a) Except in the case of a summary suspension as provided in section 17, before the
834 Mayor denies an application for initial or renewal licensure or suspends or revokes a license, or
835 imposes a civil fine, the Mayor shall give the owner or operator of the emergency medical
836 services agency, emergency medical response vehicle, or emergency medical services training
837 facility, against whom the action is contemplated written notice of the contemplated action. The
838 notice shall inform the affected entity of the reason for the action and of the right to request a
839 hearing.
840 (b) If requested, the hearing shall be conducted by the Office of Administrative Hearings.
841 Sec. 219. Judicial review.
842 An individual or entity aggrieved by a decision of the Office of Administrative Hearings
843 may appeal the decision to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, in accordance with the
844 District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act of 1968, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat.
845 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), and pursuant to the Office of Administrative Hearings
846 Establishment Act of 2001, effective March 6, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-76; D.C. Official Code § 2-
847 1831.01 et seq.).
848 Sec. 220. Specialty systems of care.
849 (a) The Mayor shall establish criteria for the designation of hospitals capable of
850 supporting specialty systems of care within the District. The Mayor shall adopt classifications of
851 specialty systems of care, including criteria, data reporting standards, and other requirements for
852 each classification.
37

853 (b) No hospital shall advertise or hold itself out as providing a specialized level of care
854 without holding a designation as issued by the Mayor in accordance with this section.
855 (c) An applicant for designation as a specialty care facility shall establish to the
856 satisfaction of the Mayor that the hospital meets all requirements set forth in this act and in rules
857 issued pursuant to this act.
858 (d) An applicant for a designation shall:
859 (1) Submit an application to the Mayor, on a form approved by the Mayor;
860 (2) Submit supporting documentation as required by the Mayor;
861 (3) Pay the applicable designation fee as established by the Mayor through
862 rulemaking; and
863 (4) Pay the applicable inspection fee as established by the Mayor through
864 rulemaking.
865 (e) A designation as a specialty care facility shall be issued for a period of time not to
866 exceed 2 years.
867 (f) A designation shall be valid only for the person and premises named as the applicants
868 in the application. Any change in the ownership of a designated hospital owned by an individual,
869 partnership, or partnership or in the legal or beneficial ownership of 25% or more of the stock of
870 the corporation that owns or operates a designated hospital, shall require a new application for
871 designation.
872 (g) The Mayor may establish and maintain a database of information regarding specialty
873 systems of care and emergency medical care services provided within the District of Columbia.
874 All hospitals, healthcare facilities, and treatment facilities receiving patients, either by an
875 emergency medical services response vehicle or through other means of arrival, and all entities
38

876 providing emergency medical care services, shall provide data to the Mayor as specified in
877 rulemaking promulgated pursuant to this act.
878 (h) To the extent that specialty systems of care and emergency medical care records
879 compiled and maintained by the Mayor, hospitals, other health care facilities, treatment facilities,
880 or emergency medical services providers in connection with the specialty systems of care and
881 emergency medical care information system pursuant to this act contain patient identifiable data,
882 that data shall be maintained pursuant to applicable privacy laws.
883 Sec. 221. Advertising.
884 (a) No person, entity, or government agency shall advertise or disseminate information or
885 otherwise hold itself out to the public as offering emergency medical services, ambulance
886 services, mobile integrated health services, special event medical services, or stretcher van
887 services unless that service is provided by a person, entity, or governmental agency that is
888 licensed to provide such services pursuant to this act and the rules issued pursuant to this act.
889 (b) No person, entity, or government agency shall advertise or disseminate information,
890 or otherwise hold itself out to the public as offering emergency medical services training, unless
891 that training is provided by persons certified as emergency medical services instructors pursuant
892 to this act and to rules promulgated pursuant to this act.
893 Sec. 222. Emergency medical services for children.
894 The Mayor shall establish, in collaboration with a licensed hospital within the District of
895 Columbia specializing in pediatric care, a program of emergency medical services for children.
896 The purpose of this program shall be to continue, to the extent that funds are made available
897 through federal government grants, District appropriated funds, or private sources, the operation
39

898 and development of programs designed to improve the emergency medical care provided to
899 children within the District of Columbia.
900 Sec. 223. Establishment of Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committees.
901 (a) The Mayor may establish one or more advisory committees to provide advice on:
902 (1) Best practices in emergency medical services across the United States to assist
903 in establishing performance goals for emergency medical services in the District;
904 (2) Recommend standards, or revisions to existing standards, to be applied to the
905 delivery of emergency medical services in accordance with the appropriate District, federal, and
906 regional laws, rules, regulations, and inter-jurisdictional agreements;
907 (3) The development of a program of public information and education with
908 respect to emergency medical services;
909 (4) The development of an emergency medical data collection system for the
910 District and on the categorization of emergency facilities and services;
911 (5) The coordination of District emergency medical services with those
912 emergency medical service activities and projects coordinated through the Metropolitan
913 Washington Council of Governments;
914 (6) Any other area related to emergency medical services as designated by the
915 Mayor.
916 (c) Members of advisory committees shall serve without compensation.
917 Sec. 224. Rulemaking.
918 The Mayor, pursuant to the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved
919 October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules to
920 implement the provisions of this act, including:
40

921 (1) Minimum standards of operation of an emergency medical services agency,
922 including:
923 (A) Medical director and staff qualifications and responsibilities;
924 (B) Premises and equipment standards;
925 (C) Hours and scope of operation;
926 (D) Safety and health standards; and
927 (E) Record keeping and reporting requirements;
928 (2) Minimum standards of operation of an emergency medical response vehicle,
929 including:
930 (A) Operator and attendant qualifications;
931 (B) Vehicle, equipment, and supplies requirements;
932 (C) Safety and health standards; and
933 (D) Record keeping and reporting requirements;
934 (3) Minimum standards of operation of an emergency medical services training
935 facility, including:
936 (A) Premises and equipment standards;
937 (B) Director and instructor qualifications and responsibilities;
938 (C) Curricula and course contents;
939 (D) Competency evaluations; and
940 (E) Record keeping and reporting requirements;
941 (4) Minimum standards of operation of a mobile integrated health service,
942 including:
943 (A) Minimum standards for mobile integrated healthcare service delivery;
41

944 (B) Program application, designation, renewal, and inspection procedures;
945 (C) Documentation and confidentiality requirements;
946 (D) Patient consent, privacy, and rights protections; and
947 (E) Coordination with existing emergency medical services, public health,
948 and social services infrastructure.
949 (5) Licensure application, issuance, and renewal procedures;
950 (6) Grounds and procedures for , denial, non-renewal, suspension, and revocation
951 of a license, or any other appropriate discipline;
952 (7) Standards and requirements for the operation of a 24-hour emergency
953 response vehicle service;
954 (8) Minimum standards and criteria for the designation of specialty care facilities
955 and for the designation of other specialized emergency medical care facilities as considered
956 warranted by the Mayor;
957 (9) Standards and criteria for emergency medical care data collection;
958 (10) Encouraging healthcare facilities, including long-term care and assisted
959 living facilities, to provide or procure inter-facility transport services independent of the 911
960 emergency system for their non-emergent needs; provided, that this does not limit the authority
961 of the Medical Director of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department pursuant to An
962 Act To classify the officers and members of the fire department of the District of Columbia, and
963 for other purposes, approved June 20, 1906 (34 Stat. 314; D.C. Official Code § 5-401 et seq.);
964 and
965 (11) The establishment of a fee schedule to recover the costs of regulating entities
966 established pursuant to this act.
42

967 Sec. 225. Criminal and civil penalties.
968 (a) Any person or entity who violates any provision of this act shall, upon conviction, be
969 subject to a fine not to exceed $1,000, imprisonment not to exceed 180 days, or both. Each
970 unlawful act shall constitute a separate violation.
971 (b) Any person or entity who has been previously convicted pursuant to this act shall,
972 upon conviction for a subsequent violation, be subject to a fine not to exceed $5,000,
973 imprisonment not to exceed one year, or both.
974 (c) Civil fines and penalties may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any violations of
975 the provisions of this act or of rules promulgated under the authority of this act, pursuant to the
976 Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985, effective October
977 5, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-42; D.C. Official Code § 2-1801.01 et seq.). The adjudication of any
978 infraction shall be conducted by the Office of Administrative Hearings, pursuant to the Office of
979 Administrative Hearings Establishment Act of 2001, effective March 6, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-76;
980 D.C. Official Code § 2-1831.01 et seq.), the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs
981 Civil Infractions Act of 1985, effective October 5, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-42; D.C. Official Code § 2-
982 1801.01 et seq.), and to rules promulgated pursuant to those acts.
983 Sec. 226. Prosecutions.
984 (a) Criminal prosecutions for violations of this act shall be brought by the Attorney
985 General for the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia.
986 (b) In any prosecution initiated pursuant to this act, a person or entity claiming an
987 exemption from a licensing or certification requirement of this act shall have the burden of
988 proving entitlement to the exemption.
989 Sec. 227. Injunctions.
43

990 (a) The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may bring an action in the Superior
991 Court of the District of Columbia, in the name of the District of Columbia, to enjoin any
992 violation of this act.
993 (b) The remedy established by this section shall be in addition to disciplinary action
994 initiated by the Mayor, civil sanctions, and criminal prosecution.
995 (c) In any proceeding brought pursuant to this section, it shall not be necessary to prove
996 that any person has been injured by the violation alleged.
997 Sec. 228. Pending actions and proceedings; existing orders.
998 (a) No judicial or administrative proceeding commenced by or against an emergency
999 medical services agency, emergency medical response vehicle owner or operator, emergency
1000 medical services training facility or instructor, emergency medical technician, or paramedic shall
1001 abate by reason of the taking effect of this Act. Each such action or proceeding shall be
1002 continued with substitution as to parties and government agencies as appropriate.
1003 (b) The Emergency Medical Services Regulations (29 DCMR § 500 et seq.) in effect on
1004 the effective date of this act shall continue in effect until modified, rescinded, or superseded by
1005 rules issued pursuant to this act.
1006 (c) All decisions issued pursuant to such Emergency Medical Services Regulations shall
1007 remain valid, in effect, and subject to review as provided in such regulations.”.
1008 TITLE III. CONFORMING AMENDMENTS, REPEALERS, AND STANDARD
1009 PROVISIONS
1010 Sec. 301. The Emergency Medical Services Act of 2008, effective March 25, 2009 (D.C.
1011 Law 17-357; D.C. Official Code § 7-2341.01 et seq.), is repealed.
44

1012 Sec. 302. Section 2(a)(7) of the Health-Care and Community Residence Facility, Hospice
1013 and Home Care Licensure Act of 1983, effective February 24, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-48; D.C.
1014 Official Code § 44-501(a)(7)) is amended by striking the phrase “other than a hospice,” and
1015 inserting the phrase “other than a hospice or licensed mobile integrated health service,” in its
1016 place.
1017 Sec. 303. Fiscal impact statement.
1018 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
1019 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
1020 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
1021 Sec. 304. Effective date.
1022 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
1023 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
1024 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
1025 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D. C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
1026 Columbia Register.
45

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: September 25, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of the “Health Occupations and Emergency Medical
Services Amendment Act of 2026” (AD-26-296)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: December 3, 2025
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – District of Columbia Health Care Act of 2025
REFERENCE: Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
November 21, 2025
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
The bill updates1 how Emergency Medical Services (EMS) professionals practicing in the District of
Columbia are licensed and regulated. The bill establishes a nine-member Emergency Medical
Services Board (Board) to regulate EMS clinicians and educators within the District of Columbia. The
Board will have regulatory authority over Emergency Medical Responders, Emergency Medical
Technicians, Advanced Emergency Medical Technicians, Paramedics, Advanced Practice Paramedics,
Mobile Integrated Healthcare Clinicians, Emergency Medical Services Instructors, and Emergency
Medical Dispatchers. The Board will be supported by a full-time Executive Director, who will
implement and administer the Board's orders. The bill expands2 the types of EMS agencies regulated
by DC Health and transitions the regulation of EMS professionals to the new Board.
1 By amending The District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective March 25, 1986
(D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01 et seq.).
2 By repealing and replacing The Emergency Medical Services Act of 2008, effective January 16, 2009 (D.C.
Law 17-691; D.C. Official Code § 7-2341.01 et seq.).
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “District of Columbia Health Care Act of 2025,” Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue
Analysis on November 21, 2025.
The bill allows3 the Director of DC Health to appoint a temporary member to boards when vacancies
on a board are equal to or more than 50 percent of the total number of members. Temporary
members must meet all qualifications required of members and cannot be appointed for more than
120 days. Temporary members cannot be appointed more than once to a specific board as a
temporary member.
The bill establishes a license and scope of practice for Certified Community Health Workers and Oral
and Maxillofacial Surgeons.
Finally, the bill clarifies4 that licensed mobile integrated health agencies are not considered home
health agencies under the law. Mobile integrated health agencies bring healthcare directly to
patients' homes for services such as follow-up care, chronic disease management, and connecting
individuals to social services.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill. DC Health can establish the new Board, regulate EMS agencies, appoint temporary
board members, and establish new licenses with existing staff and resources. There is no cost to
clarifying the definition of home health agencies.
3 Id.
4 By amending The Health-Care and Community Residence Facility, Hospice and Home Care Licensure Act of
1983, effective February 24, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-48; D.C. Official Code § 44-501 et seq.).
Page 2 of 2